Utah statutes.
58-55-308.   Scope of practice -- Installation, repair, maintenance, cleaning, or replacement of gas appliance or combustion system -- Rules.

(1) (a)  The commission, with the concurrence of the director, may adopt reasonable rules pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to define and limit the scope of practice and operating standards of the classifications and subclassifications licensed under this chapter in a manner consistent with established practice in the relevant industry.

(b)  The commission and the director may limit the field and scope of operations of a licensee under this chapter in accordance with the rules and the public health, safety, and welfare, based on the licensee's education, training, experience, knowledge, and financial responsibility.

(2) (a)  The work and scope of practice covered by this Subsection (2) is the installation, repair, maintenance, cleaning, or replacement of a residential or commercial gas appliance or combustion system.

(b)  The provisions of this Subsection (2) apply to any:

(i)  licensee under this chapter whose license authorizes the licensee to perform the work described in Subsection (2)(a); and

(ii)  person exempt from licensure under Subsection 58-55-305(1)(h).

(c)  Any person described in Subsection (2)(b) that performs work described in Subsection (2)(a):

(i)  must first receive training and certification as specified in rules adopted by the division; and

(ii)  shall ensure that any employee authorized under other provisions of this chapter to perform work described in Subsection (2)(a) has first received training and certification as specified in rules adopted by the division.

(d)  The division may exempt from the training requirements adopted under Subsection (2)(c) a person that has adequate experience, as determined by the division.

(3)  The division may exempt the following individuals from the certification requirements adopted under Subsection (2)(c):

(a)  a person who has passed a test equivalent to the level of testing required by the division for certification, or has completed an apprenticeship program that teaches the installation of gas line appliances and is approved by the Federal Bureau of Apprenticeship Training; and

(b)  a person working under the immediate one-to-one supervision of a certified natural gas technician or a person exempt from certification.

(4)  This section does not prohibit a licensed specialty contractor from accepting and entering into a contract involving the use of two or more crafts or trades if the performance of the work in the crafts or trades, other than that in which the contractor is licensed, is incidental and supplemental to the work for which the contractor is licensed.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

